Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 95.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201021-195
Relation to Electronic Signatures
in Global and National Commerce Act.

(ULLCA 1102) The Nebraska Uniform Limited Liability Company
Act modifies, limits, and supersedes the federal Electronic Signatures in
Global and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. 7001 et seq., but does not modify,
limit, or supersede section 101(c) of that act, 15 U.S.C. 7001(c), or authorize
electronic delivery of any of the notices described in section 103(b) of that
act, 15 U.S.C. 7003(b).

Laws 2010, LB888, § 95.
January 1, 2011